Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201081-1813
Committee; adopt
rules and regulations; forms and materials; provide.

The
committee may, subject to the approval of the commission, adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations prescribing the procedures to be followed in the filing
of applications and proceedings under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations
Act and any other matters the committee considers appropriate, including special
circumstances, such as when expenses of job retraining or similar employment-related
rehabilitative services are involved, under which an award from
the Victim's Compensation Fund may exceed ten thousand dollars.
The committee shall make available all forms and educational materials necessary
to promote the existence of the programs to persons throughout the state.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 13;

Laws 1981, LB 328, § 7;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 14;

Laws 2009, LB598, § 6.